apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
	<pardef n="rež/ati__vblex">
     <e>       <p><l>ati</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>at</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>im</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>iš</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>i</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>iva</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ita</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ita</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>imo</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ite</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ijo</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>al</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>i</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>anj</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="šola/ti__vblex">
     <e>       <p><l>ti</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>t</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>m</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>š</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l></l>       <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>va</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ta</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ta</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>mo</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>te</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>jo</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>l</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>
     <e>       <p><l>n</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__dan"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>j</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>nj</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="zviša/ti__vblex">
     <e>       <p><l>ti</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>t</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>m</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>š</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l></l>       <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>va</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ta</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ta</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>mo</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>te</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>jo</l>     <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>l</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>
     <e>       <p><l>n</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__dan"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>j</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>nj</l>      <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="štrl/eti__vblex">
     <e>       <p><l>eti</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>et</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>im</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>iš</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>i</l>       <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>iva</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ita</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ita</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>imo</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ite</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ijo</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>el</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>
     <e>       <p><l>eč</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__dan"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>i</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

	  <e>       <p><l>enj</l>      <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="bičati">          <i>biča</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="čuvati">          <i>čuva</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="goljufati">       <i>goljufa</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gubati">          <i>guba</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="kuhati">          <i>kuha</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mrmrati">         <i>mrmra</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="namakati">        <i>namaka</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="obhajati">        <i>obhaja</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="obravnavati">     <i>obravnava</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="odsevati">        <i>odseva</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="operirati">       <i>operira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pogrešati">       <i>pogreša</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="predvidevati">    <i>predvideva</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="presojati">       <i>presoja</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="računati">        <i>računa</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="skušati">         <i>skuša</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="spregati">        <i>sprega</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="uporabljati">     <i>uporablja</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="uspavati">        <i>uspava</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="vrtati">          <i>vrta</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="vzpodbujati">     <i>vzpodbuja</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="znati">           <i>zna</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="izbruhati">       <i>izbruha</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="izjedkati">       <i>izjedka</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="izprašati">       <i>izpraša</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="izvrtati">        <i>izvrta</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="napudrati">       <i>napudra</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="naslikati">       <i>naslika</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="obarvati">        <i>obarva</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="obvladati">       <i>obvlada</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ogoljufati">      <i>ogoljufa</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="olepšati">        <i>olepša</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pobarvati">       <i>pobarva</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="podaljšati">      <i>podaljša</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ponižati">        <i>poniža</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="posekati">        <i>poseka</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="poteptati">       <i>potepta</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="povišati">        <i>poviša</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="predati">         <i>preda</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="preluknjati">     <i>preluknja</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="prepoznati">      <i>prepozna</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="preštudirati">    <i>preštudira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="prevarati">       <i>prevara</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="priigrati">       <i>priigra</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="razmehčati">      <i>razmehča</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="razvozlati">      <i>razvozla</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="skomponirati">    <i>skomponira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="skuhati">         <i>skuha</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="začarati">        <i>začara</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="zaračunati">      <i>zaračuna</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="zmanjšati">       <i>zmanjša</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="zvišati">         <i>zviša</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="amputirati">      <i>amputira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="blokirati">       <i>blokira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="cenzurirati">     <i>cenzurira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="degradirati">     <i>degradira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="diskreditirati">  <i>diskreditira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="formulirati">     <i>formulira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="interpretirati">  <i>interpretira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="konsumirati">     <i>konsumira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="koordinirati">    <i>koordinira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="legitimirati">    <i>legitimira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="oksidirati">      <i>oksidira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="paralizirati">    <i>paralizira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="programirati">    <i>programira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="registrirati">    <i>registrira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="specializirati">  <i>specializira</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="zaupati">         <i>zaupa</i><par n="šola/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="bombardirati">    <i>bombardira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dirigirati">      <i>dirigira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="identificirati">  <i>identificira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="kontrolirati">    <i>kontrolira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="motivirati">      <i>motivira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="planirati">       <i>planira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="simbolizirati">   <i>simbolizira</i><par n="zviša/ti__vblex"/></e>
